Hawaii statutes.
§510-25 Perfection of title of personal
representative, heirs, or devisee. If title to any property to which this
part applies is held by the surviving spouse at the time of the decedent's
death, the personal representative or an heir or devisee of the decedent may
institute an action to perfect title to the property. The personal
representative has no fiduciary duty to discover or attempt to discover whether
any property held by the surviving spouse is property to which this part
applies, unless a written demand is made by an heir, devisee, or creditor of
the decedent. [L 1973, c 132, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next